Illinois, session 104th, SB1516.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Identification Card Act is amended 5by changing Section 12 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 335/12)  (from Ch. 124, par. 32)7    Sec. 12. Fees concerning standard Illinois Identification 8Cards. The fees required under this Act for standard Illinois 9Identification Cards must accompany any application provided 10for in this Act, and the Secretary shall collect such fees as 11follows:12    a. Original card................................$2013    b. Renewal card.................................2014    c. Corrected card...............................1015    d. Duplicate card...............................2016    e. Certified copy with seal ....................517    f. (Blank) 18    g. Applicant 65 years of age or over ...........No Fee19    h. (Blank) 20    i. Individual living in Veterans21        Home or Hospital ...........................No Fee22    j. Original card under 18 years of age..........$523    k. Renewal card under 18 years of age...........$5  SB1516- 2 -LRB104 09943 SPS 20013 b1    l. Corrected card under 18 years of age.........$52    m. Duplicate card under 18 years of age.........$53    n. Homeless person..............................No Fee 4    o. Duplicate card issued to an active-duty5        member of the United States Armed Forces, 6        the member's spouse, or dependent children7        living with the member......................No Fee8    p. Duplicate temporary card.....................$59    q. First card issued to a youth 10        for whom the Department of Children 11        and Family Services is legally responsible 12        or a foster child upon turning the age of 13        16 years old until he or she reaches 14        the age of 21 years old.................... No Fee 15    r. Original card issued to a committed16        person upon release from the17        Department of Corrections, the18        Department of Juvenile Justice, 19        a Federal Bureau of Prisons 20        facility located in Illinois, 21        or a county jail or a county 22        department of corrections .No Fee23    s. Limited-term Illinois Identification24        Card issued to a committed person25        upon release from the Department of26        Corrections, the Department of  SB1516- 3 -LRB104 09943 SPS 20013 b1        Juvenile Justice, a Federal Bureau 2        of Prisons facility located in 3        Illinois, or a county jail or a 4        county department of corrections .No Fee5    t. Original card issued to a 6        person up to 14 days prior 7        to or upon conditional release 8        or absolute discharge from 9        the Department of Human Services........... No Fee 10    u. Limited-term Illinois Identification 11        Card issued to a person up to 12        14 days prior to or upon 13        conditional release or absolute discharge 14        from the Department of Human Services...... No Fee15    v. Original card issued to a 16        transgender person, or the immediate 17        family of that person, moving to 18        Illinois due to an act of persecution. No Fee 19    All fees collected under this Act shall be paid into the 20Road Fund of the State treasury, except that the following 21amounts shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund: (i) 80% of 22the fee for an original, renewal, or duplicate Illinois 23Identification Card issued on or after January 1, 2005; and 24(ii) 80% of the fee for a corrected Illinois Identification 25Card issued on or after January 1, 2005. 26    An individual, who resides in a veterans home or veterans   SB1516- 4 -LRB104 09943 SPS 20013 b1hospital operated by the State or federal government, who 2makes an application for an Illinois Identification Card to be 3issued at no fee, must submit, along with the application, an 4affirmation by the applicant on a form provided by the 5Secretary of State, that such person resides in a veterans 6home or veterans hospital operated by the State or federal 7government.8    The application of a homeless individual for an Illinois 9Identification Card to be issued at no fee must be accompanied 10by an affirmation by a qualified person, as defined in Section 114C of this Act, on a form provided by the Secretary of State, 12that the applicant is currently homeless as defined in Section 131A of this Act. 14    For the application for the first Illinois Identification 15Card of a youth for whom the Department of Children and Family 16Services is legally responsible or a foster child to be issued 17at no fee, the youth must submit, along with the application, 18an affirmation by his or her court appointed attorney or an 19employee of the Department of Children and Family Services on 20a form provided by the Secretary of State, that the person is a 21youth for whom the Department of Children and Family Services 22is legally responsible or a foster child.23    The fee for any duplicate identification card shall be 24waived for any person who presents the Secretary of State's 25Office with a police report showing that his or her 26identification card was stolen.   SB1516- 5 -LRB104 09943 SPS 20013 b1    The fee for any duplicate identification card shall be 2waived for any person age 60 or older whose identification 3card has been lost or stolen. 4    As used in this Section, "active-duty member of the United 5States Armed Forces" means a member of the Armed Services or 6Reserve Forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 7National Guard who is called to active duty pursuant to an 8executive order of the President of the United States, an act 9of the Congress of the United States, or an order of the 10Governor. 11(Source: P.A. 103-782, eff. 8-6-24; revised 10-21-24.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.